New York, session 2025-2026, A6832.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The closing paragraph of section 260.20 of the penal law, 2 as amended by chapter 362 of the laws of 1992, is amended to read as 3 follows: 4 Unlawfully dealing with a child in the first degree is a class A 5 misdemeanor and any person who violates the provisions of subdivision 6 two of this section shall, upon first conviction thereof, be punished by 7 a fine of one hundred twenty-five dollars or by imprisonment in a county 8 jail or penitentiary for a term of not less than thirty days nor more 9 than one year or both, and upon a second conviction thereof shall be 10 punished by a fine not less than two hundred fifty dollars or by impri- 11 sonment in a county jail or penitentiary for a term of not less than 12 sixty days nor more than one year or both, and upon a third conviction 13 thereof shall be punished by a fine not less than three hundred seven- 14 ty-five dollars or by imprisonment in a county jail or penitentiary for 15 a term of not less than one hundred twenty days nor more than one year 16 or both, and upon a fourth conviction thereof shall be punished by a 17 fine not less than five hundred dollars or by imprisonment in a county 18 jail or penitentiary for a term of not less than one hundred eighty days 19 nor more than one year or both, and upon all subsequent convictions 20 thereof shall be punished by a fine of not less than one thousand 21 dollars or by imprisonment in a county jail or penitentiary for a term 22 of one year or both. 23 § 2. This act shall take effect on the first of November next succeed- 24 ing the date on which it shall have become a law. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD08961-01-5